Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF464.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.69, subdivision 6d, is amended to read: Subd. 6d. Prescription drugs. new text begin (a) new text end The commissioner may exclude or modify coverage for prescription drugs from the prepaid managed care contracts entered into under this section in order to increase savings to the state by collecting additional prescription drug rebates. The contracts must maintain incentives for the managed care plan to manage drug costs and utilization and may require that the managed care plans maintain an open drug formulary. In order to manage drug costs and utilization, the contracts may authorize the managed care plans to use preferred drug lists and prior authorization. This deleted text begin subdivisiondeleted text end new text begin paragraphnew text end is contingent on federal approval of the managed care contract changes and the collection of additional prescription drug rebates. new text begin (b) A prepaid health plan or a county-based purchasing plan providing prescription drug coverage for eligible persons pursuant to chapters 256B and 256L must pay a dispensing fee for the pharmacy service in dispensing a prescribed drug in an amount at least equal to the dispensing fee set forth in section 256B.0625, subdivision 13e, paragraph (a). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of human services shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. new text end